District of Columbia statutes.
19-906

Supersession.

This chapter supersedes the rule of the common law known as the rule against perpetuities.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 402(b), 48 DCR 2087
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 9 of the Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities Act.